sublime_text_3/Packages/russian_english.aff
SET UTF-8
TRY '-.ABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyzЁАБВГДЕЖЗИЙКЛМНОПРСТУФХЦЧШЩЪЫЬЭЮЯабвгдежзийклмнопрстуфхцчшщъыьэюяё
FLAG NUMBER

PFX 1 Y 1
PFX 1 0 trans .

PFX 2 Y 3
PFX 2 0 re .
PFX 2 0 re [^e]
PFX 2 0 re- e

PFX 3 Y 3
PFX 3 0 de .
PFX 3 0 de [^e]
PFX 3 0 de- e

PFX 4 Y 1
PFX 4 0 dis .

PFX 5 Y 6
PFX 5 0 co [aeiouh]
PFX 5 0 col l
PFX 5 0 com [bmp]
PFX 5 0 con .
PFX 5 0 con [^abehilmopru].
PFX 5 0 cor r

PFX 6 Y 5
PFX 6 0 il l
PFX 6 0 im [bmp]
PFX 6 0 in .
PFX 6 0 in [^blmpr]
PFX 6 0 ir r

PFX 7 Y 2
PFX 7 0 pre .
PFX 7 0 pro .

PFX 8 Y 1
PFX 8 0 non- .

PFX 9 Y 1
PFX 9 0 un .

PFX 10 Y 1
PFX 10 0 mis .

PFX 11 Y 1
PFX 11 0 over .

PFX 12 Y 1
PFX 12 0 out .

PFX 13 Y 2
PFX 13 0 under [^r]
PFX 13 0 under- r

REP 153
REP a ei
REP a ey
REP ai ie
REP air are
REP air ear
REP air ere
REP are air
REP are ear
REP are eir
REP cc k
REP ce ts
REP ch k
REP ch s
REP ch te
REP ch ti
REP ch tu
REP ci s
REP ck qu
REP ck que
REP dg j
REP di j
REP ear air
REP ear are
REP ear ere
REP ear ier
REP eau o
REP ee i
REP eg e.g.
REP ei a
REP eir are
REP eir ere
REP eness ity
REP ere air
REP ere ear
REP ere eir
REP ew o
REP ew oo
REP ew u
REP ew ue
REP ew ui
REP ey a
REP f gh
REP f ph
REP f ugh
REP ff ugh
REP ge j
REP gg j
REP gh f
REP ght t
REP i ee
REP i igh
REP i uy
REP ie ai
REP ie i.e.
REP ier ear
REP ieu oo
REP ieu u
REP igh i
REP j dg
REP j di
REP j ge
REP j gg
REP k cc
REP k ch
REP k qu
REP kw qu
REP leness ility
REP ness ity
REP ness ivity
REP o eau
REP o ew
REP oe u
REP og ogue
REP ok OK
REP oo ew
REP oo ieu
REP oo u
REP oo ui
REP ph f
REP qu k
REP qu w
REP s ch
REP s ci
REP s ti
REP shun cion
REP shun sion
REP shun tion
REP ss z
REP t ght
REP te ch
REP ti ch
REP ti s
REP ts ce
REP tu ch
REP u ew
REP u ieu
REP u oe
REP u oo
REP ue ew
REP uf ough
REP uff ough
REP ui ew
REP ui oo
REP uy i
REP w qu
REP w ugh
REP z ss
REP SFX - Y 22
REP SFX - 0 ization [^aemsy]
REP SFX - 0 ization [^i]s
REP SFX - 0 ization [^u]m
REP SFX - 0 ization [aeiou]y
REP SFX - 0 izations [^aemsy]
REP SFX - 0 izations [^i]s
REP SFX - 0 izations [^u]m
REP SFX - 0 izations [aeiou]y
REP SFX - 0 tization a
REP SFX - 0 tizations a
REP SFX - e ization [^l]e
REP SFX - e ization [aeiou]le
REP SFX - e izations [^l]e
REP SFX - e izations [aeiou]le
REP SFX - le ilization [^aeiou]le
REP SFX - le ilizations [^aeiou]le
REP SFX - s zation is
REP SFX - s zations is
REP SFX - um ization um
REP SFX - um izations um
REP SFX - y ization [^aeiou]y
REP SFX - y izations [^aeiou]y
REP SFX + Y 22
REP SFX + 0 izability [^aemsy]
REP SFX + 0 izability [^i]s
REP SFX + 0 izability [^u]m
REP SFX + 0 izability [aeiou]y
REP SFX + 0 izable [^aemsy]
REP SFX + 0 izable [^i]s
REP SFX + 0 izable [^u]m
REP SFX + 0 izable [aeiou]y
REP SFX + 0 tizability a
REP SFX + 0 tizable a
REP SFX + e izability [^l]e
REP SFX + e izability [aeiou]le
REP SFX + e izable [^l]e
REP SFX + e izable [aeiou]le
REP SFX + le ilizability [^aeiou]le
REP SFX + le ilizable [^aeiou]le
REP SFX + s zability is
REP SFX + s zable is
REP SFX + um izability um
REP SFX + um izable um
REP SFX + y izability [^aeiou]y
REP SFX + y izable [^aeiou]y

SFX 14 Y 9
SFX 14 0 atically [aeiou]m
SFX 14 0 ically [^aeiou]m
SFX 14 0 ically [^aemry]
SFX 14 0 ically [^e]r
SFX 14 0 tically ma
SFX 14 a ically [^m]a
SFX 14 e ically e
SFX 14 er rically er
SFX 14 y ically y

SFX 15 Y 21
SFX 15 0 biness [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 15 0 diness [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 15 0 finess [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 15 0 giness [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 15 0 iness [^aeio]e[nrt]
SFX 15 0 iness [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 15 0 iness [^ebcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 15 0 iness [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 15 0 iness [aeiouy]e
SFX 15 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 15 0 kiness [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 15 0 liness [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 15 0 miness [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 15 0 niness [^aeio][aiou]n
SFX 15 0 piness [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 15 0 riness [^aeio][aiou]r
SFX 15 0 siness [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 15 0 tiness [^aeio][aiou]t
SFX 15 0 viness [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 15 0 ziness [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 15 e iness [^aeiouy]e

SFX 16 Y 20
SFX 16 0 ist [aeiou]e
SFX 16 0 ist [aeioubp]y
SFX 16 0 ists [^eoy]
SFX 16 0 ist's [^eoy]
SFX 16 0 ists [aeiou]e
SFX 16 0 ist's [aeiou]e
SFX 16 0 ists [aeioubp]y
SFX 16 0 ist's [aeioubp]y
SFX 16 ce tist ce
SFX 16 ce tists ce
SFX 16 ce tist's ce
SFX 16 e ist [^aceiou]e
SFX 16 e ists [^aceiou]e
SFX 16 e ist's [^aceiou]e
SFX 16 o ist o
SFX 16 o ists o
SFX 16 o ist's o
SFX 16 y ist [^aeioubp]y
SFX 16 y ists [^aeioubp]y
SFX 16 y ist's [^aeioubp]y

SFX 17 Y 15
SFX 17 0 swoman [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 swoman [bdknmt]
SFX 17 0 swoman's [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 swoman's [bdknmt]
SFX 17 0 swomen [aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 swomen [bdknmt]
SFX 17 0 woman [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 woman [^bdeknmt]
SFX 17 0 woman [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 woman's [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 woman's [^bdeknmt]
SFX 17 0 woman's [^bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 women [^aeiou][bdklmnt]e
SFX 17 0 women [^bdeknmt]
SFX 17 0 women [^bdklmnt]e

SFX 18 Y 3
SFX 18 0 ful [^y]
SFX 18 0 ful [aeiou]y
SFX 18 y iful [^aeiou]y

SFX 19 Y 9
SFX 19 0 able [^acegilou]e
SFX 19 0 able [^aeiou][cl]
SFX 19 0 able [^cely]
SFX 19 0 able [aeio][aeiou][cl]
SFX 19 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX 19 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 19 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 19 e able [acegilou]e
SFX 19 y iable [^aeiou]y

SFX 20 Y 44
SFX 20 0 ize [^aemsy]
SFX 20 0 ize [^i]s
SFX 20 0 ize [^u]m
SFX 20 0 ize [aeiou]y
SFX 20 0 ized [^aemsy]
SFX 20 0 ized [^i]s
SFX 20 0 ized [^u]m
SFX 20 0 ized [aeiou]y
SFX 20 0 izes [^aemsy]
SFX 20 0 izes [^i]s
SFX 20 0 izes [^u]m
SFX 20 0 izes [aeiou]y
SFX 20 0 izing [^aemsy]
SFX 20 0 izing [^i]s
SFX 20 0 izing [^u]m
SFX 20 0 izing [aeiou]y
SFX 20 0 tize a
SFX 20 0 tized a
SFX 20 0 tizes a
SFX 20 0 tizing a
SFX 20 e ize [^l]e
SFX 20 e ize [aeiou]le
SFX 20 e ized [^l]e
SFX 20 e ized [aeiou]le
SFX 20 e izes [^l]e
SFX 20 e izes [aeiou]le
SFX 20 e izing [^l]e
SFX 20 e izing [aeiou]le
SFX 20 le ilize [^aeiou]le
SFX 20 le ilized [^aeiou]le
SFX 20 le ilizes [^aeiou]le
SFX 20 le ilizing [^aeiou]le
SFX 20 s ze is
SFX 20 s zed is
SFX 20 s zes is
SFX 20 s zing is
SFX 20 um ize um
SFX 20 um ized um
SFX 20 um izes um
SFX 20 um izing um
SFX 20 y ize [^aeiou]y
SFX 20 y ized [^aeiou]y
SFX 20 y izes [^aeiou]y
SFX 20 y izing [^aeiou]y

SFX 21 Y 33
SFX 21 0 izer [^aemsy]
SFX 21 0 izer [^i]s
SFX 21 0 izer [^u]m
SFX 21 0 izer [aeiou]y
SFX 21 0 izers [^aemsy]
SFX 21 0 izer's [^aemsy]
SFX 21 0 izers [^i]s
SFX 21 0 izer's [^i]s
SFX 21 0 izers [^u]m
SFX 21 0 izer's [^u]m
SFX 21 0 izers [aeiou]y
SFX 21 0 izer's [aeiou]y
SFX 21 0 tizer a
SFX 21 0 tizers a
SFX 21 0 tizer's a
SFX 21 e izer [^l]e
SFX 21 e izer [aeiou]le
SFX 21 e izers [^l]e
SFX 21 e izer's [^l]e
SFX 21 e izers [aeiou]le
SFX 21 e izer's [aeiou]le
SFX 21 le ilizer [^aeiou]le
SFX 21 le ilizers [^aeiou]le
SFX 21 le ilizer's [^aeiou]le
SFX 21 s zer is
SFX 21 s zers is
SFX 21 s zer's is
SFX 21 um izer um
SFX 21 um izers um
SFX 21 um izer's um
SFX 21 y izer [^aeiou]y
SFX 21 y izers [^aeiou]y
SFX 21 y izer's [^aeiou]y

SFX 22 Y 104
SFX 22 0 а в
SFX 22 0 а ин
SFX 22 0 о в
SFX 22 0 о ин
SFX 22 0 ого ин
SFX 22 0 ой в
SFX 22 0 ой ин
SFX 22 0 ом в
SFX 22 0 ом ин
SFX 22 0 ому ин
SFX 22 0 у в
SFX 22 0 у ин
SFX 22 0 ы в
SFX 22 0 ы ин
SFX 22 0 ым в
SFX 22 0 ым ин
SFX 22 0 ыми в
SFX 22 0 ыми ин
SFX 22 0 ых в
SFX 22 0 ых ин
SFX 22 ий ая [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ая [жшщч]ий
SFX 22 ий его [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ее [жншщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ей [жншщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ем [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ему [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ею [жншщч]ий
SFX 22 ий ого [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ое [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ой [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ом [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ому [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ою [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ую [гкх]ий
SFX 22 ий ую [жшщч]ий
SFX 22 ий юю ний
SFX 22 ий яя ний
SFX 22 ийся аяся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся егося [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся ееся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся ейся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся емся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся емуся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся еюся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся иеся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся имися [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся имся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся ихся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 ийся уюся [шщ]ийся
SFX 22 й е [гкх]ий
SFX 22 й е [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 й е ый
SFX 22 й м [гкх]ий
SFX 22 й м [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 й м ый
SFX 22 й ми [гкх]ий
SFX 22 й ми [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 й ми ый
SFX 22 й х [гкх]ий
SFX 22 й х [жнршщч]ий
SFX 22 й х ый
SFX 22 й ю ой
SFX 22 ой ая ой
SFX 22 ой ие [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой им [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой ими [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой их [гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой ого ой
SFX 22 ой ое ой
SFX 22 ой ом ой
SFX 22 ой ому ой
SFX 22 ой ую ой
SFX 22 ой ые [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой ым [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой ыми [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ой ых [^гжкхшщч]ой
SFX 22 ом ая ом
SFX 22 ом ие [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ий [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом им [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ими [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом их [чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ого ом
SFX 22 ом ое ом
SFX 22 ом ому ом
SFX 22 ом ые [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ый [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ым [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ыми [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ом ых [^чхшщкжг]ом
SFX 22 ый ая ый
SFX 22 ый его цый
SFX 22 ый ее цый
SFX 22 ый ей цый
SFX 22 ый ем цый
SFX 22 ый ему цый
SFX 22 ый ого [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ое [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ой [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ом [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ому [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ою [^ц]ый
SFX 22 ый ую ый

SFX 23 Y 20
SFX 23 0 ability [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 23 0 ability [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX 23 0 ability [acegilou]e
SFX 23 0 ability [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 23 0 ability [aeiou]y
SFX 23 0 able [^aeiou]
SFX 23 0 able [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 23 0 able [^ebcdfgklmnprstvzy]
SFX 23 0 able [acegilou]e
SFX 23 0 able [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]
SFX 23 0 able [aeiou]y
SFX 23 0 able ee
SFX 23 0 bability [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 23 0 bable [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 23 0 dability [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 23 0 dable [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 23 0 fability [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 23 0 fable [^aeio][aeiou]f
SFX 23 0 gability [^aeio][aeiou]g
SFX 23 0 gable [^aeio][aeiou]g

SFX 24 Y 29
SFX 24 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 24 0 kability [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 24 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]c
SFX 24 0 kable [^aeio][aeiou]k
SFX 24 0 lability [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 24 0 lable [^aeio][aeiou]l
SFX 24 0 mability [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 24 0 mable [^aeio][aeiou]m
SFX 24 0 nability [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX 24 0 nable [^aeio][aeiou]n
SFX 24 0 pability [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 24 0 pable [^aeio][aeiou]p
SFX 24 0 rability [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX 24 0 rable [^aeio][aeiou]r
SFX 24 0 sability [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 24 0 sable [^aeio][aeiou]s
SFX 24 0 tability [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX 24 0 table [^aeio][aeiou]t
SFX 24 0 vability [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 24 0 vable [^aeio][aeiou]v
SFX 24 0 zability [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 24 0 zable [^aeio][aeiou]z
SFX 24 0 те [^ст]ь
SFX 24 0 те [ий]
SFX 24 e ability [^a]te
SFX 24 e ability [^acegilotu]e
SFX 24 e able [^a]te
SFX 24 e able [^acegilotu]e
SFX 24 e able [^aeiou]e

SFX 25 Y 37
SFX 25 te bility ate
SFX 25 te ble ate
SFX 25 y iability [^aeiou]y
SFX 25 y iable [^aeiou]y
SFX 25 ем ая [чхшщкжг]ем
SFX 25 ем его ем
SFX 25 ем ее ем
SFX 25 ем ему ем
SFX 25 ем ие ем
SFX 25 ем ий ем
SFX 25 ем им ем
SFX 25 ем ими ем
SFX 25 ем их ем
SFX 25 ем яя [^чхшщкжг]ем
SFX 25 ить и ить
SFX 25 оть и оть
SFX 25 оть ите оть
SFX 25 оться ись оться
SFX 25 оться итесь оться
SFX 25 сь тесь ись
SFX 25 ся тесь [^т]ься
SFX 25 ся тесь йся
SFX 25 ть й [аея]ть
SFX 25 ть йте [аея]ть
SFX 25 ться йся [аея]ться
SFX 25 ться йтесь [аея]ться
SFX 25 ться сь иться
SFX 25 ться тесь иться
SFX 25 уть и уть
SFX 25 уть ите уть
SFX 25 уться ись уться
SFX 25 уться итесь уться
SFX 25 ыть ой ыть
SFX 25 ыть ойте ыть
SFX 25 ыться ойся ыться
SFX 25 ыться ойтесь ыться
SFX 25 ь е ить

SFX 26 Y 12
SFX 26 ая ие [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ий [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая им [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ими [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая их [чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ой ая
SFX 26 ая ую ая
SFX 26 ая ые [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ый [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ым [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ыми [^чхшщкжг]ая
SFX 26 ая ых [^чхшщкжг]ая

SFX 27 Y 2
SFX 27 0 bed [^aeio][aeiou]b
SFX 27 0 d [^e]e

SFX 28 Y 3
SFX 28 0 d e
SFX 28 0 ded [^aeio][aeiou]d
SFX 28 0 ed [^aeiou][bcdfgklmnprstvz]

SFX 29 Y 1
SFX 29 0 ed [^ebcdfgklmnprstvyz]

SFX 30 Y 2
SFX 30 0 ed [^ey]
SFX 30 0 ed [aeio][aeiou][bcdfgkmnprstvz]

SFX 31 Y 1
SFX 31 0 ed [aeio][eiou]l
